tortoisesvn/ext/spell/ar.aff
FLAG	long
#هما
SFX	e6	Y	12
SFX	e6	ى	يان/EdEhElX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	e6	ي	يان/EdEhElX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	e6	0	ان/EdEhElX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	e6	ى	يا/EdEpEtX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	e6	ي	يا/EdEpEtX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	e6	0	ا/EdEpEtX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	e6	ى	يان/EcEgEkX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	e6	ي	يان/EcEgEkX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	e6	0	ان/EcEgEkX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	e6	ى	يا/EcEoEsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	e6	ي	يا/EcEoEsX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	e6	0	ا/EcEoEsX0	[^أئءاآيوى]

#هم
SFX	e7	Y	6
SFX	e7	ى	ون/EdEhElX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	e7	ي	ون/EdEhElX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	e7	0	ون/EdEhElX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	e7	ى	وا/EdEpEtX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	e7	ي	وا/EdEpEtX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	e7	0	وا/EdEpEtX0	[^أئءاآيوى]

#هن
SFX	e8	Y	4
SFX	e8	ن	ن/EdEhElEpEtX0	ن
SFX	e8	ى	ين/EdEhElEpEtX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	e8	ي	ين/EdEhElEpEtX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	e8	0	ن/EdEhElEpEtX0	[^نأئءاآيوى]

#مجموعة-لواحق-المضارع-الأولى،-الصنف-السادس-SFX---06/06/01-=-260-261-262-263-264-265-266-
#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	f1	Y	15
SFX	f1	أ	أ/FaFeFiFmFqX0	أ
SFX	f1	ئ	أ/FaFeFiFmFqX0	ئ
SFX	f1	ى	ي/FaFeFiFmFqX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f1	ى	0/FaFqX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f1	0	0/FaFeFiFmFqX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	f1	أ	أ/FbFfFjFnFrX0	أ
SFX	f1	ئ	أ/FbFfFjFnFrX0	ئ
SFX	f1	ى	ي/FbFfFjFnFrX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f1	ى	0/FbFrX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f1	0	0/FbFfFjFnFrX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	f1	أ	أ/FcFgFkFoFsX0	أ
SFX	f1	ئ	أ/FcFgFkFoFsX0	ئ
SFX	f1	ى	ي/FcFgFkFoFsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f1	ى	0/FcFsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f1	0	0/FcFgFkFoFsX0	[^أئءاآيوى]

#أنت-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	f2	Y	24
SFX	f2	أ	ئين/FcFgFkX0	أ
SFX	f2	ئ	ئين/FcFgFkX0	ئ
SFX	f2	ى	ين/FcFgFkX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f2	0	ين/FcFgFkX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	f2	أ	ئي/FcFoFsX0	أ
SFX	f2	ئ	ئي/FcFoFsX0	ئ
SFX	f2	ى	ي/FcFoFsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f2	0	ي/FcFoFsX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	f2	أ	آن/FcFgFkX0	أ
SFX	f2	ئ	آن/FcFgFkX0	ئ
SFX	f2	ى	يان/FcFgFkX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f2	0	ان/FcFgFkX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	f2	أ	آ/FcFoFsX0	أ
SFX	f2	ئ	آ/FcFoFsX0	ئ
SFX	f2	ى	يا/FcFoFsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f2	0	ا/FcFoFsX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	f2	أ	ؤون/FcFgFkX0	أ
SFX	f2	ئ	ؤون/FcFgFkX0	ئ
SFX	f2	ى	ون/FcFgFkX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f2	0	ون/FcFgFkX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	f2	أ	ؤوا/FcFoFsX0	أ
SFX	f2	ئ	ؤوا/FcFoFsX0	ئ
SFX	f2	ى	وا/FcFoFsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f2	0	وا/FcFoFsX0	[^أئءاآيوى]

#أنتن
SFX	f3	Y	5
SFX	f3	ن	ن/FcFgFkFoFsX0	ن
SFX	f3	أ	أن/FcFgFkFoFsX0	أ
SFX	f3	ئ	أن/FcFgFkFoFsX0	ئ
SFX	f3	ى	ين/FcFgFkFoFsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f3	0	ن/FcFgFkFoFsX0	[^نأئءاآيوى]

#هو
SFX	f4	Y	5
SFX	f4	أ	أ/FdFhFlFpFtX0	أ
SFX	f4	ئ	أ/FdFhFlFpFtX0	ئ
SFX	f4	ى	ي/FdFhFlFpFtX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f4	ى	0/FdFtX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f4	0	0/FdFhFlFpFtX0	[^أئءاآيوى]

#هي
SFX	f5	Y	5
SFX	f5	أ	أ/FcFgFkFoFsX0	أ
SFX	f5	ئ	أ/FcFgFkFoFsX0	ئ
SFX	f5	ى	ي/FcFgFkFoFsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f5	ى	0/FcFsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f5	0	0/FcFgFkFoFsX0	[^أئءاآيوى]

#هما
SFX	f6	Y	16
SFX	f6	أ	آن/FdFhFlX0	أ
SFX	f6	ئ	آن/FdFhFlX0	ئ
SFX	f6	ى	يان/FdFhFlX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f6	0	ان/FdFhFlX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	f6	أ	آ/FdFpFtX0	أ
SFX	f6	ئ	آ/FdFpFtX0	ئ
SFX	f6	ى	يا/FdFpFtX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f6	0	ا/FdFpFtX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	f6	أ	آن/FcFgFkX0	أ
SFX	f6	ئ	آن/FcFgFkX0	ئ
SFX	f6	ى	يان/FcFgFkX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f6	0	ان/FcFgFkX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	f6	أ	آ/FcFoFsX0	أ
SFX	f6	ئ	آ/FcFoFsX0	ئ
SFX	f6	ى	يا/FcFoFsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f6	0	ا/FcFoFsX0	[^أئءاآيوى]

#هم
SFX	f7	Y	8
SFX	f7	أ	ؤون/FdFhFlX0	أ
SFX	f7	ئ	ؤون/FdFhFlX0	ئ
SFX	f7	ى	ون/FdFhFlX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f7	0	ون/FdFhFlX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	f7	أ	ؤوا/FdFpFtX0	أ
SFX	f7	ئ	ؤوا/FdFpFtX0	ئ
SFX	f7	ى	وا/FdFpFtX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f7	0	وا/FdFpFtX0	[^أئءاآيوى]

#هن
SFX	f8	Y	5
SFX	f8	ن	ن/FdFhFlFpFtX0	ن
SFX	f8	أ	أن/FdFhFlFpFtX0	أ
SFX	f8	ئ	أن/FdFhFlFpFtX0	ئ
SFX	f8	ى	ين/FdFhFlFpFtX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	f8	0	ن/FdFhFlFpFtX0	[^نأئءاآيوى]

##مجموعة-لواحق-المضارع-الثانية،-الصنف-الأول-SFX---01/06/02-=-310-311-312-313-314-315-316-317
#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	g1	Y	60
SFX	g1	أ	ؤ/AaAeAiAmAqX0	أ
SFX	g1	اء	اء/AaAeAiAmAqX0	اء
SFX	g1	آ	أى/AaAeAiAmAqX0	آ
SFX	g1	ا	ى/AaAeAiAmAqX0	[^ي]ا
SFX	g1	ا	ا/AaAeAiAmAqX0	يا
SFX	g1	ى	ى/AaAeAiAmAqX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	g1	ي	ي/AaAeAiAmAqX0	ي
SFX	g1	ءى	ءى/AaAeAiAmAqX0	ءى
SFX	g1	أى	أى/AaAeAiAmAqX0	[ت]أى
SFX	g1	أى	أى/AaAeAiAmAqX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	g1	اء	أ/AaAqX0	اء
SFX	g1	آ	ء/AaAqX0	آ
SFX	g1	ا	0/AaAqX0	[^ي]ا
SFX	g1	ا	0/AaAqX0	يا
SFX	g1	ى	0/AaAqX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	g1	ي	0/AaAqX0	ي
SFX	g1	ءى	ء/AaAqX0	ءى
SFX	g1	أى	أ/AaAqX0	[ت]أى
SFX	g1	أى	ء/AaAqX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	g1	0	0/AaAeAiAmAqX0	[^أءاآيى]
SFX	g1	أ	ؤ/AbAfAjAnArX0	أ
SFX	g1	اء	اء/AbAfAjAnArX0	اء
SFX	g1	آ	أى/AbAfAjAnArX0	آ
SFX	g1	ا	ى/AbAfAjAnArX0	[^ي]ا
SFX	g1	ا	ا/AbAfAjAnArX0	يا
SFX	g1	ى	ى/AbAfAjAnArX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	g1	ي	ي/AbAfAjAnArX0	ي
SFX	g1	ءى	ءى/AbAfAjAnArX0	ءى
SFX	g1	أى	أى/AbAfAjAnArX0	[ت]أى
SFX	g1	أى	أى/AbAfAjAnArX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	g1	اء	أ/AbArX0	اء
SFX	g1	آ	ء/AbArX0	آ
SFX	g1	ا	0/AbArX0	[^ي]ا
SFX	g1	ا	0/AbArX0	يا
SFX	g1	ى	0/AbArX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	g1	ي	0/AbArX0	ي
SFX	g1	ءى	ء/AbArX0	ءى
SFX	g1	أى	أ/AbArX0	[ت]أى
SFX	g1	أى	ء/AbArX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	g1	0	0/AbAfAjAnArX0	[^أءاآيى]
SFX	g1	أ	ؤ/AcAgAkAoAsX0	أ
SFX	g1	اء	اء/AcAgAkAoAsX0	اء
SFX	g1	آ	أى/AcAgAkAoAsX0	آ
SFX	g1	ا	ى/AcAgAkAoAsX0	[^ي]ا
SFX	g1	ا	ا/AcAgAkAoAsX0	يا
SFX	g1	ى	ى/AcAgAkAoAsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	g1	ي	ي/AcAgAkAoAsX0	ي
SFX	g1	ءى	ءى/AcAgAkAoAsX0	ءى
SFX	g1	أى	أى/AcAgAkAoAsX0	[ت]أى
SFX	g1	أى	أى/AcAgAkAoAsX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	g1	اء	أ/AcAsX0	اء
SFX	g1	آ	ء/AcAsX0	آ
SFX	g1	ا	0/AcAsX0	[^ي]ا
SFX	g1	ا	0/AcAsX0	يا
SFX	g1	ى	0/AcAsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	g1	ي	0/AcAsX0	ي
SFX	g1	ءى	ء/AcAsX0	ءى
SFX	g1	أى	أ/AcAsX0	[ت]أى
SFX	g1	أى	ء/AcAsX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	g1	0	0/AcAgAkAoAsX0	[^أءاآيى]

#أنت-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	g2	Y	66
SFX	g2	أ	ئين/AcAgAkX0	أ
SFX	g2	ؤ	ئين/AcAgAkX0	ؤ
SFX	g2	اء	ائين/AcAgAkX0	اء
SFX	g2	آ	أين/AcAgAkX0	آ
SFX	g2	ا	ين/AcAgAkX0	ا
SFX	g2	ى	ين/AcAgAkX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	g2	ي	ين/AcAgAkX0	ي
SFX	g2	ءى	ءين/AcAgAkX0	ءى
SFX	g2	أى	أين/AcAgAkX0	[ت]أى
SFX	g2	أى	أين/AcAgAkX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	g2	0	ين/AcAgAkX0	[^أؤءاآيى]
SFX	g2	أ	ئي/AcAoAsX0	أ
SFX	g2	ؤ	ئي/AcAoAsX0	ؤ
SFX	g2	اء	ائي/AcAoAsX0	اء
SFX	g2	آ	أي/AcAoAsX0	آ
SFX	g2	ا	ي/AcAoAsX0	ا
SFX	g2	ى	ي/AcAoAsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	g2	ي	ي/AcAoAsX0	ي
SFX	g2	ءى	ءي/AcAoAsX0	ءى
SFX	g2	أى	أي/AcAoAsX0	[ت]أى
SFX	g2	أى	أي/AcAoAsX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	g2	0	ي/AcAoAsX0	[^أؤءاآيى]
SFX	g2	أ	ؤان/AcAgAkX0	أ
SFX	g2	ؤ	ؤان/AcAgAkX0	ؤ
SFX	g2	اء	اءان/AcAgAkX0	اء
SFX	g2	آ	أيان/AcAgAkX0	آ
SFX	g2	ا	يان/AcAgAkX0	ا
SFX	g2	ى	يان/AcAgAkX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	g2	ي	يان/AcAgAkX0	ي
SFX	g2	ءى	ءيان/AcAgAkX0	ءى
SFX	g2	أى	أيان/AcAgAkX0	[ت]أى
SFX	g2	أى	أيان/AcAgAkX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	g2	0	ان/AcAgAkX0	[^أؤءاآيى]
SFX	g2	أ	ؤا/AcAoAsX0	أ
SFX	g2	ؤ	ؤا/AcAoAsX0	ؤ
SFX	g2	اء	اءا/AcAoAsX0	اء
SFX	g2	آ	أيا/AcAoAsX0	آ
SFX	g2	ا	يا/AcAoAsX0	ا
SFX	g2	ى	يا/AcAoAsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	g2	ي	يا/AcAoAsX0	ي
SFX	g2	ءى	ءيا/AcAoAsX0	ءى
SFX	g2	أى	أيا/AcAoAsX0	[ت]أى
SFX	g2	أى	أيا/AcAoAsX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	g2	0	ا/AcAoAsX0	[^أؤءاآيى]
SFX	g2	أ	ؤون/AcAgAkX0	أ
SFX	g2	ؤ	ؤون/AcAgAkX0	ؤ
SFX	g2	اء	اؤون/AcAgAkX0	اء
SFX	g2	آ	أون/AcAgAkX0	آ
SFX	g2	ا	ون/AcAgAkX0	ا
SFX	g2	ى	ون/AcAgAkX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	g2	ي	ون/AcAgAkX0	ي
SFX	g2	ءى	ءون/AcAgAkX0	ءى
SFX	g2	أى	أون/AcAgAkX0	[ت]أى
SFX	g2	أى	أون/AcAgAkX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	g2	0	ون/AcAgAkX0	[^أؤءاآيى]
SFX	g2	أ	ؤوا/AcAoAsX0	أ
SFX	g2	ؤ	ؤوا/AcAoAsX0	ؤ
SFX	g2	اء	اؤوا/AcAoAsX0	اء
SFX	g2	آ	أوا/AcAoAsX0	آ
SFX	g2	ا	وا/AcAoAsX0	ا
SFX	g2	ى	وا/AcAoAsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	g2	ي	وا/AcAoAsX0	ي
SFX	g2	ءى	ءوا/AcAoAsX0	ءى
SFX	g2	أى	أوا/AcAoAsX0	[ت]أى
SFX	g2	أى	أوا/AcAoAsX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	g2	0	وا/AcAoAsX0	[^أؤءاآيى]

#أنتن
SFX	g3	Y	10
SFX	g3	أ	ؤن/AcAgAkAoAsX0	أ
SFX	g3	اء	أن/AcAgAkAoAsX0	اء
SFX	g3	آ	أين/AcAgAkAoAsX0	آ
SFX	g3	ا	ين/AcAgAkAoAsX0	ا
SFX	g3	ى	ين/AcAgAkAoAsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	g3	ي	ين/AcAgAkAoAsX0	ي
SFX	g3	ءى	ءين/AcAgAkAoAsX0	ءى
SFX	g3	أى	أين/AcAgAkAoAsX0	[ت]أى
SFX	g3	أى	أين/AcAgAkAoAsX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	g3	0	ن/AcAgAkAoAsX0	[^أءاآيى]

#هو
SFX	g4	Y	20
SFX	g4	أ	ؤ/AdAhAlApAtX0	أ
SFX	g4	اء	اء/AdAhAlApAtX0	اء
SFX	g4	آ	أى/AdAhAlApAtX0	آ
SFX	g4	ا	ى/AdAhAlApAtX0	[^ي]ا
SFX	g4	ا	ا/AdAhAlApAtX0	يا
SFX	g4	ى	ى/AdAhAlApAtX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	g4	ي	ي/AdAhAlApAtX0	ي
SFX	g4	ءى	ءى/AdAhAlApAtX0	ءى
SFX	g4	أى	أى/AdAhAlApAtX0	[ت]أى
SFX	g4	أى	أى/AdAhAlApAtX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	g4	اء	أ/AdAtX0	اء
SFX	g4	آ	ء/AdAtX0	آ
SFX	g4	ا	0/AdAtX0	[^ي]ا
SFX	g4	ا	0/AdAtX0	يا
SFX	g4	ى	0/AdAtX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	g4	ي	0/AdAtX0	ي
SFX	g4	ءى	ء/AdAtX0	ءى
SFX	g4	أى	أ/AdAtX0	[ت]أى
SFX	g4	أى	ء/AdAtX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	g4	0	0/AdAhAlApAtX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
